src/norm.xfst
read regex [
â (->) a, î (->) i, û (->) u, Â (->) A, Î (->) İ, Û (->) U
].o.[
A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, Ç (->) ç, D (->) d, E (->) e, F (->) f, G (->) g, Ğ (->) ğ,
H (->) h, I (->) ı, İ (->) i, J (->) j, K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o,
Ö (->) ö, P (->) p, R (->) r, S (->) s, Ş (->) ş, T (->) t, U (->) u, Ü (->) ü, V (->) v,
Y (->) y, Z (->) z, Â (->) â, Î (->) î, Û (->) û, Q (->) q, W (->) w, X (->) x,
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, ğ (->) Ğ,
h (->) H, ı (->) I, i (->) İ, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O,
ö (->) Ö, p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, ş (->) Ş, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, v (->) V,
y (->) Y, z (->) Z, â (->) Â, î (->) Î, û (->) Û, q (->) Q, w (->) W, x (->) X
|| .#. _
].o.[
[" "|%'|%-] (->) 0
];
